Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Employment of Handicapped

195.150.
Definitions for KRS 195.150 to 195.200. [Repealed.]

195.160.
Commission on Employment of Physically Handicapped — Membership. [Repealed.]

195.170.
Personnel — Advisory committees — Expenses. [Repealed.]

195.180.
Duties. [Repealed.]

195.190.
Staff assistance. [Repealed.]

195.200.
Disposition of gifts and grants. [Repealed.]